New Jersey, session 222, S4120.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Freedom Flag is designated an official State flag for recognizing the lives lost in the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, and the lives lost in the aftermath of September 11, 2001.  The Freedom Flag depicts a blue background, a white star surrounded by five white bars, a top and a bottom red strip, two broad red stripes, and three white stripes. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT In anticipation of the 25th anniversary of the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks, this bill designates the Freedom Flag as the States official flag for recognizing all of the innocent lives lost as a result of the attacks.  This is of special importance to the people of this State as over 700 residents lost their lives in the terrorist attacks.  The Freedom Flag serves to support educational efforts for teaching future generations about the tragic events that unfolded on September 11, 2001. Richard Melito created the Freedom Flag in the days following September 11, 2001, to commemorate the events of the tragedy.  The flag has a blue background, representing the unity of Americans for freedom.  It features a white star that symbolizes all who lived and died for freedom.  The star is surrounded by five white bars, which represents the Pentagon.  The flag next has four red stripes: the top red stripe representing those who died at the Pentagon and the passengers and crew of American Airlines Flight 77; the bottom red stripe representing those who died on United Airlines Flight 93; and two broad red stripes, representing the Twin Towers and those who died at the World Trade Center and on American Airlines Flight 11 and United Airlines Flight 175.  Finally, the flag features three white stripes, which represent the first responders who worked tirelessly both during and after the attacks. Designating the Freedom Flag as an official State flag symbolizes the States commitment to remembering the tragic events of September 11, 2001, and its aftermath.  The effects of September 11, 2001, continue to be seen to the present day as first responders, who heroically risked their lives, are suffering from adverse health effects from aiding in the recovery effort.  These adverse health effects have increased the total number of fatalities arising from the September 11, 2001, attacks.